Hawaii statutes.
[§182-17] Penalty for violation. Any
person who violates any provision of this chapter, or any regulation adopted
pursuant hereto, shall be fined not more than $500 for each offense. If any
person after receiving written notice for a violation fails to cure such
violation within such time and under such conditions as determined by the rules
and regulations, such person shall be subject to a citation for a new and
separate violation. There shall be a fine not more than $500 for each
additional violation. [L 1978, c 135, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next